District of Columbia statutes.
47-874

Regulations.

The Chief Financial Officer may promulgate regulations to carry out the purpose of this chapter and amend or repeal any existing regulations promulgated to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

Oct. 2, 1990, D.C. Law 8-180, § 5, 37 DCR 5039
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 2002(h), 48 DCR 6981
1981 Ed., § 47-874.
D.C. Law 14-28 rewrote the section.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of Real Property Tax Assessment Transition Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-23, September 6, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9093).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of Real Property Tax Assessment Transition Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-44, April 18, 2001, 48 DCR 3844).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of Real Property Tax Assessment Transition Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-116, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7659).